Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3930
Commission; divisions established.

The following divisions are established within the commission:

(1) The capital litigation division shall be available to assist in the defense of capital cases in Nebraska, subject to caseload standards of the commission;

(2) The appellate division shall be available to prosecute appeals to the Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court, subject to caseload standards of the commission;

(3) The violent crime and drug defense division shall be available to assist in the defense of certain violent and drug crimes as defined by the commission, subject to the caseload standards of the commission;

(4) The DNA testing division shall be available to assist in representing persons who are indigent who have filed a motion pursuant to the DNA Testing Act, subject to caseload standards; and

(5) The major case resource center shall be available to assist public defenders, contracting attorneys, or court-appointed attorneys with the defense of a felony offense, subject to caseload standards of the commission.

Laws 1995, LB 646, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 659, § 17;

Laws 2003, LB 760, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 30;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The changes made to section 29-3930 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 30, have been omitted because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.
DNA Testing Act, see section 29-4116.